Nebraska, session 109, LB222.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB222 LB222
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-601, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-601 Sections 60-601 to 60-6,383 and sections 3 and 4 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Rules of the Road.
Sec. 2. Section 60-683, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-683 (1) All peace officers are hereby specifically directed and
authorized and it shall be deemed and considered a part of the official
duties of each of such officers to enforce the provisions of the Nebraska
Rules of the Road, including the specific enforcement of maximum speed
limits, and any other law regulating the operation of vehicles or the use
of the highways.
(2) To perform the official duties imposed by this section, the
Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety and all officers of
the Nebraska State Patrol shall have the powers stated in section
81-2005.
(3) Except as provided in sections 3 and 4 of this act, all All
other peace officers shall have the power:
(a) (1) To make arrests upon view and without warrant for any
violation committed in their presence of any of the provisions of the
Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act or of any other law regulating the
operation of vehicles or the use of the highways, if and when designated
or called upon to do so as provided by law;
(b) (2) To make arrests upon view and without warrant for any
violation committed in their presence of any provision of the laws of
this state relating to misdemeanors or felonies, if and when designated
or called upon to do so as provided by law;
(c) (3) At all times to direct all traffic in conformity with law
or, in the event of a fire or other emergency or in order to expedite
traffic or insure safety, to direct traffic as conditions may require;
(d) (4) When in uniform, to require the driver of a vehicle to stop
-2-

LB222 LB222
2025 2025
and exhibit his or her operator's license and registration certificate
issued for the vehicle and submit to an inspection of such vehicle and
the license plates and registration certificate for the vehicle and to
require the driver of a motor vehicle to present the vehicle within five
days for correction of any defects revealed by such motor vehicle
inspection as may lead the inspecting officer to reasonably believe that
such motor vehicle is being operated in violation of the statutes of
Nebraska or the rules and regulations of the Director of Motor Vehicles;
(e) (5) To inspect any vehicle of a type required to be registered
according to law in any public garage or repair shop or in any place
where such a vehicle is held for sale or wrecking;
(f) (6) To serve warrants relating to the enforcement of the laws
regulating the operation of vehicles or the use of the highways; and
(g) (7) To investigate traffic accidents for the purpose of carrying
on a study of traffic accidents and enforcing motor vehicle and highway
safety laws.
Sec. 3. (1) For purposes of this section, immediate, serious threat
to the safety of the operator or any other person means that, based on
the totality of the circumstances, it is reasonable for an objective
observer to believe that an equipment failure on the vehicle could cause
immediate, serious injury to the operator or any other person in the
vicinity of the vehicle.
(2) A peace officer shall not stop or detain an operator of a
vehicle to enforce any of the following violations:
(a) Any nonmoving traffic violation;
(b) Driving while such operator's license is suspended or revoked
under section 60-4,100 or 60-4,108; or
(c) Any warrant for a misdemeanor, other than a warrant for a
misdemeanor:
(i) Under section 28-306, 60-498.01, 60-698, 60-6,196, 60-6,197, or
60-6,198;
-3-

LB222 LB222
2025 2025
(ii) Under subdivision (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), or (10) of
section 60-6,197.03;
(iii) For a violation of a protection order; or
(iv) For violation of a civil court order.
(3)(a) A peace officer shall not stop or detain an operator of a
vehicle if the primary reason for such stop or detention is an equipment
failure violation unless such violation:
(i) Relates to the vehicle operated by the operator; and
(ii) Poses an immediate, serious threat to the safety of the
operator or any other person.
(b) Prior to stopping or detaining the operator of the vehicle under
this subsection, the peace officer shall log digitally or notify dispatch
of the primary reason for the stop before initiating the stop or
detainment, including a detailed description of the immediate, serious
threat to the safety of the operator or any other person.
(c) Upon first contact with the operator of the vehicle during a
stop or detainment under this subsection, the peace officer shall inform
the operator of the reason for the stop or detainment, and shall not
request a consent search under section 4 of this act of the operator, any
passenger, or the vehicle.
(d) The peace officer shall not question the operator or any
passenger of the vehicle on a subject other than the equipment failure
violation that initiated the stop, unless the peace officer observes
evidence in plain view that establishes reasonable suspicion sufficient
to question the operator or any passenger about an independent criminal
offense.
Sec. 4. (1) For purposes of this section, authorized person means
the operator of the vehicle.
(2) Prior to searching any vehicle, a peace officer shall obtain a
warrant or written consent to search such vehicle from an authorized
person.
-4-

LB222 LB222
2025 2025
(3) To obtain such written consent, the peace officer shall provide
the authorized person:
(a) An oral explanation of the reason for and effects of providing
written consent; and
(b) A written consent form that explains the purpose of the search,
that the search is voluntary, that such authorized person may ask to
speak with an attorney prior to consenting to such search, and that such
authorized person may choose not to consent to the search or may revoke
consent to the search at any point.
(4) The written form provided under this section shall state plainly
and explicitly that such authorized person shall not be punished or
suffer retaliation for not consenting to be searched or revoking such
consent.
(5) Such written form shall be:
(a) Available in the English and Spanish languages; and
(b) Explained orally to any authorized person who is unable to read
the form. An interpreter service shall be used when necessary.
(6) Any evidence observed or seized during a stop, detention, or
search made in violation of this section is inadmissible in any criminal
proceeding.
Sec. 5. Section 81-2005, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2005 On and after July 20, 2002, the Superintendent of Law
Enforcement and Public Safety and all officers of the Nebraska State
Patrol, except all carrier enforcement officers assigned to the carrier
enforcement division, and except as provided in sections 3 and 4 of this
act, shall have the power:
(1) Of peace officers for the purpose of enforcing the Motor Vehicle
Operator's License Act, the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, the Nebraska
Rules of the Road, and any other law regulating the registration or
operation of vehicles or the use of the highways;
-5-

LB222 LB222
2025 2025
(2) To make arrests upon view and without warrant for any violation
committed in their presence of any of the provisions of the Motor Vehicle
Operator's License Act, the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, the Nebraska
Rules of the Road, or any other law regulating the operation of vehicles
or the use of the highways, if and when designated or called upon to do
so as provided by law;
(3) To make arrests upon view and without warrant for any violation
committed in their presence of any provision of the laws of the state
relating to misdemeanors or felonies, if and when designated or called
upon to do so as provided by law;
(4) At all times to direct all traffic in conformity with law or, in
the event of a fire or other emergency or in order to expedite traffic or
insure safety, to direct traffic as conditions may require
notwithstanding the provisions of law;
(5) When in uniform, to require the driver of a vehicle to stop and
exhibit his or her operator's license and registration card issued for
the vehicle and submit to an inspection of such vehicle and the license
plates and registration card thereon and to require the drivers of motor
vehicles to present such vehicles within five days for correction of any
defects revealed by such motor vehicle inspection as may lead the
inspecting officer to reasonably believe that such motor vehicle is being
operated in violation of the statutes of Nebraska or the rules and
regulations of the Director of Motor Vehicles;
(6) To inspect any vehicle of a type required to be registered under
the Motor Vehicle Registration Act in any public garage or repair shop or
in any place where such vehicles are held for sale or wrecking;
(7) To serve warrants relating to the enforcement of the laws
regulating the operation of vehicles or the use of the highways;
(8) To investigate traffic accidents for the purpose of carrying on
a study of traffic accidents and enforcing motor vehicle and highway
safety laws; and
-6-

LB222 LB222
2025 2025
(9) To operate weighing stations and portable scales and to perform
carrier enforcement powers and duties prescribed in sections 60-1301 to
60-1309.
Carrier enforcement officers appointed to the carrier enforcement
division before July 20, 2002, shall have the powers and duties
prescribed in sections 60-1301 to 60-1309.
Sec. 6. Original sections 60-683 and 81-2005, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and section 60-601, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 7. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-7-